Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2187.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 20, chapter 4, article 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1057.21, to read: START_STATUTE20-1057.21. Hearing aids; evidences of coverage; children; definitions A. A health care services organization that issues, amends, delivers or renews an evidence of coverage shall provide full coverage for any hearing aid and related service for an enrollee who is under eighteen years of age or who is under twenty-one years of age if the enrollee is still attending high school. B. A health care services organization may make available to the enrollee the option of purchasing additional hearing aid coverage that exceeds the services described in this section. C. The hearing aid coverage shall include fitting and dispensing services, providing ear molds, as necessary to maintain optimal fit, and any related services as provided by a licensed health care provider. D. This section does not apply to short-term travel, accident-only or limited benefit coverage as defined in section 20-1137. E. Coverage for hearing aids may be subject to deductibles and coinsurance consistent with those imposed on other benefits under the same evidence of coverage. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "hearing aid": (a) Means durable medical equipment that is of a design and circuitry to optimize audibility and listening skills in the environment commonly experienced by children. (b) Includes: (i) Cochlear implants. (ii) Bone-conductive hearing devices. (iii) Any other required device that is intended to amplify or create hearing. 2. "Licensed health care provider" means a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17, an audiologist who is licensed pursuant to title 36, chapter 17 and a hearing aid dispenser who is licensed pursuant to title 36, chapter 17. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Applicability Section 20-1057.21, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, applies to evidences of coverage issued with an effective date on or after December 31, 2026.